Utah statutes.
26-21a-302.   Cancer Research Restricted Account.

(1)  As used in this section, "account" means the Cancer Research Restricted Account created by this section.

(2)  There is created in the General Fund a restricted account known as the "Cancer Research Restricted Account."

(3)  The account shall be funded by:

(a)  contributions deposited into the account in accordance with Section 41-1a-422;

(b)  private contributions;

(c)  donations or grants from public or private entities; and

(d)  interest and earnings on fund money.

(4)  Funds in the account are nonlapsing.

(5)  The department shall distribute funds in the account to one or more charitable organizations that:

(a)  qualify as being tax exempt under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code;

(b)  have been designated as an official cancer center of the state;

(c)  is a National Cancer Institute designated cancer center; and

(d)  have as part of its primary mission:

(i)  cancer research programs in basic science, translational science, population science, and clinical research to understand cancer from its beginnings; and

(ii)  the dissemination and use of knowledge developed by the research described in Subsection (5)(d)(i) for the creation and improvement of cancer detection, treatments, prevention, and outreach programs.

(6) (a)  An organization described in Subsection (5) may apply to the department to receive a distribution in accordance with Subsection (5).

(b)  An organization that receives a distribution from the department in accordance with Subsection (5) shall expend the distribution only to conduct cancer research for the purpose of making improvements in cancer treatments, cures, detection, and prevention of cancer at the molecular and genetic levels.

(c)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the department may make rules providing procedures for an organization to apply to the department to receive a distribution under Subsection (5).

